Maryland, session 2025, SB0913.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0913*

SENATE BILL 913
Article – Agriculture
11–204.2.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, unless registered with the
Secretary under § 11–204.3 or § 11–204.4 of this subtitle OR § 11–502 OF THIS TITLE, a
weight and measure may not be used or possessed for current use for:
(1) Buying or selling any commodity or object;
(2) Hire or award;
(3) Computing any charge or payment for services rendered on the basis of
weight and measurement; or
(4) Determining any weight and measure for a charge.
(b) This section does not apply to counting scales.
11–204.6.
(a) (1) There is a [“Weights and Measures Fund”] WEIGHTS AND MEASURES
FUND.
(2) All fees collected under §§ 11–204.3, 11–204.4, and 11–204.7 of this
subtitle AND § 11–502 OF THIS TITLE shall be credited to the Fund.
(3) The Fund shall be used to defray the expenses of administering this
title.
(b) (1) The Fund shall be used for the purposes stated in this title.
(2) At the end of a fiscal year, any unspent or unencumbered balance in the
Fund may not revert to the General Fund of the State, but shall remain in the Weights and
Measures Fund.
11–208.1.
(a) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO VIOLATIONS UNDER SUBTITLE 5 OF
THIS TITLE.
(B) Instead of pursuing criminal charges provided in this article, the Secretary
may impose on any person who violates this title a civil penalty of:
(1) For a first violation, not more than $500;

SENATE BILL 913 3
(2) For a second violation, not more than $1,000; or
(3) For a third or subsequent violation, not more than $2,000.
[(b)] (C) Penalties collected by the Secretary under this section shall be paid into
the General Fund of the State.
[(c)] (D) The Secretary shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section.
SUBTITLE 5. ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT.
11–501.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT” MEANS A UNIT THAT:
(1) CONTROLS THE POWER SUPPLY TO ONE OR MORE ELECTRIC
VEHICLES THROUGH A CONNECTED POINT AT WHICH CURRENT IS TAKEN TO
CHARGE A BATTERY OR ANY OTHER ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE IN AN ELECTRIC
VEHICLE; AND
(2) IS CAPABLE OF PROVIDING, AT A MINIMUM:
(I) LEVEL 2 CHARGING; OR
(II) DIRECT CURRENT FAST CHARGING.
(C) “PRIVATE ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT” MEANS ELECTRIC
VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT THAT IS AVAILABLE TO AND ACCESSIBLE BY ONLY THE
OWNER OF THE EQUIPMENT AND IS NOT AVAILABLE TO OR ACCESSIBLE BY THE
PUBLIC.
(D) “PUBLIC ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT” MEANS ELECTRIC
VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT THAT:
(1) IS AVAILABLE TO AND ACCESSIBLE BY THE PUBLIC TO CHARGE AN
ELECTRIC VEHICLE FOR A FEE; AND
(2) MAY BE AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC ONLY DURING A SPECIFIC
PERIOD OF TIME.

SENATE BILL 913
(E) “PUBLIC FUNDS” MEANS ANY FINANCIAL COMPENSATION FROM THE
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, THE STATE, OR A LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR UTILITY
RATEPAYERS.
(F) “SHARED PRIVATE ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT” MEANS
ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT:
(1) THAT IS AVAILABLE TO AND ACCESSIBLE BY ONLY:
(I) EMPLOYEES, TENANTS, AND VISITORS OF THE OWNER OF
THE ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT; AND
(II) INDIVIDUALS RESIDING IN A MULTIFAMILY DWELLING AT
WHICH THE OWNER HAS INSTALLED ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT; AND
(2) FOR WHICH PAYMENT OF A FEE IS NOT REQUIRED TO CHARGE AN
ELECTRIC VEHICLE.
(G) “UPTIME” MEANS THE AVAILABILITY AND CONSISTENCY OF ELECTRIC
VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT TO SUCCESSFULLY DISPENSE ELECTRICITY AS
DESIGNED, MEASURED AS A PERCENTAGE OF BOTH HOURS AND DAYS OF A YEAR.
11–502.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) PRIVATE ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT;
(2) SHARED PRIVATE ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT; OR
(3) ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT THAT IS REGISTERED
WITH THE COMPTROLLER OR THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION.
(B) (1) THE OWNER OF PUBLIC ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT
SHALL REGISTER THE ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT WITH THE
SECRETARY.
(2) UNLESS REGISTERED WITH THE SECRETARY UNDER THIS
SECTION, PUBLIC ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT MAY NOT BE USED TO
CHARGE AN ELECTRIC VEHICLE:
(I) ON OR AFTER OCTOBER 1, 2026, FOR PUBLIC ELECTRIC
VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT PLACED IN SERVICE BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2025; OR

SENATE BILL 913 5
(II) ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2026, FOR PUBLIC ELECTRIC
VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT PLACED IN SERVICE ON OR AFTER OCTOBER 1, 2025.
(C) AN APPLICANT FOR REGISTRATION SHALL:
(1) SUBMIT AN APPLICATION FOR REGISTRATION ON THE FORM THAT
THE SECRETARY REQUIRES; AND
(2) PAY A REGISTRATION FEE SET BY THE SECRETARY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) (1) THE SECRETARY SHALL ISSUE A CERTIFICATE OF REGISTRATION
TO EACH APPLICANT THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE
SECRETARY.
(2) (I) THE SECRETARY SHALL ESTABLISH THE FORM OF THE
CERTIFICATE OF REGISTRATION.
(II) THE FORM ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL IDENTIFY THE OWNER OF THE PUBLIC ELECTRIC VEHICLE
SUPPLY EQUIPMENT.
(3) A REGISTRANT SHALL DISPLAY THE CERTIFICATE OF
REGISTRATION CONSPICUOUSLY ON EACH PIECE OF PUBLIC ELECTRIC VEHICLE
SUPPLY EQUIPMENT OWNED BY THE REGISTRANT.
(E) (1) UNLESS A REGISTRATION IS RENEWED FOR A 1–YEAR TERM, THE
REGISTRATION EXPIRES 1 YEAR FROM THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE REGISTRATION.
(2) BEFORE A REGISTRATION EXPIRES, THE REGISTRATION MAY BE
RENEWED FOR AN ADDITIONAL 1–YEAR TERM IF THE APPLICANT:
(I) IS THE OWNER OF THE PUBLIC ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY
EQUIPMENT;
(II) PAYS THE APPLICABLE RENEWAL FEE SET BY THE
SECRETARY IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(III) SUBMITS TO THE SECRETARY AN APPLICATION FOR
RENEWAL ON THE FORM THAT THE SECRETARY REQUIRES.

SENATE BILL 913
(3) THE OWNER SHALL NOTIFY THE SECRETARY IF THE OWNER OF
PUBLIC ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT SELLS, TRANSFERS, OR MOVES THE
EQUIPMENT TO A NEW LOCATION.
(F) (1) THE SECRETARY SHALL SET THE REGISTRATION FEE AND
RENEWAL FEE AT AN AMOUNT THAT WILL COVER THE COST OF REGISTERING OR
RENEWING THE REGISTRATION OF THE PUBLIC ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY
EQUIPMENT.
(2) THE FEES COLLECTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE
DEPOSITED INTO THE WEIGHTS AND MEASURES FUND UNDER § 11–204.6 OF THIS
TITLE.
11–503.
(A) (1) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE, THE
PROVISIONS OF SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS TITLE APPLY TO PUBLIC ELECTRIC VEHICLE
SUPPLY EQUIPMENT.
(2) THE PROVISIONS OF § 11–208.1 OF THIS TITLE DO NOT APPLY TO
VIOLATIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS TITLE, THE SECRETARY
SHALL ESTABLISH A PROGRAM TO TEST THE WEIGHT AND MEASURE OF ELECTRIC
VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT THAT IS REQUIRED TO BE REGISTERED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.
(C) THE SECRETARY SHALL ENSURE THAT PUBLIC ELECTRIC VEHICLE
SUPPLY EQUIPMENT REQUIRED TO BE REGISTERED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE
CONFORMS TO THE STANDARDS ESTABLISHED BY THE NATIONAL INSTITUTE OF
STANDARDS AND TECHNOLOGY HANDBOOK 44.
11–504.
(A) THE SECRETARY, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE PUBLIC SERVICE
COMMISSION, SHALL ESTABLISH RELIABILITY AND REPORTING STANDARDS FOR
PUBLIC ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT THAT IS REQUIRED TO BE
REGISTERED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE RELIABILITY AND REPORTING STANDARDS SHALL INCLUDE, AT A
MINIMUM, FOR EACH PIECE OF ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT:
(1) THE DATE THAT THE EQUIPMENT IS PLACED IN SERVICE;

SENATE BILL 913 7
(2) THE POWER OUTPUT IN KILOWATTS, INCLUDING THE ANNUAL
KILOWATT–HOUR OUTPUT, AND LEVEL;
(3) THE NUMBER OF PORTS AND TYPES OF CONNECTORS;
(4) THE HOURS OF OPERATION;
(5) THE AMOUNT OF THE FEE TO USE THE EQUIPMENT AND THE
PAYMENT METHODS ACCEPTED;
(6) THE UPTIME; AND
(7) THE ELECTRIC VEHICLE NETWORK TO WHICH THE ELECTRIC
VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT BELONGS.
(C) THE OWNER OF ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT MAY
DESIGNATE A THIRD PARTY TO COMPLY WITH THE RELIABILITY AND REPORTING
STANDARDS ESTABLISHED BY THE SECRETARY.
(D) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO PUBLIC ELECTRIC VEHICLE
SUPPLY EQUIPMENT THAT IS CONSTRUCTED OR PURCHASED WITH PUBLIC FUNDS.
(2) THE SECRETARY MAY ESTABLISH AND IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY
AGAINST THE OWNER OF ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT FOR A VIOLATION
OF THE REPORTING AND RELIABILITY STANDARDS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(3) THE SECRETARY SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE OF AND OPPORTUNITY
TO CURE THE VIOLATION BEFORE IMPOSING A CIVIL PENALTY.
(4) PENALTIES COLLECTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE PAID
INTO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
11–505.
(A) THE SECRETARY, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE PUBLIC SERVICE
COMMISSION, SHALL ESTABLISH CONSUMER STANDARDS FOR PUBLIC ELECTRIC
VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT THAT IS REQUIRED TO BE REGISTERED UNDER §
11–502 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE CONSUMER STANDARDS SHALL INCLUDE, AT A MINIMUM:

SENATE BILL 913
(1) THE TYPE OF PAYMENT OPTIONS THAT MUST BE AVAILABLE TO
CHARGE AN ELECTRIC VEHICLE WITH PUBLIC ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY
EQUIPMENT;
(2) THE LANGUAGE OPTIONS THAT MUST BE AVAILABLE TO CHARGE
AN ELECTRIC VEHICLE WITH PUBLIC ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT;
(3) THE INFORMATION AN OWNER OF PUBLIC ELECTRIC VEHICLE
SUPPLY EQUIPMENT MUST MAKE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE, INCLUDING:
(I) CHARGING RATES;
(II) LOCATION OF PUBLIC ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY
EQUIPMENT; AND
(III) REAL TIME AVAILABILITY AND ACCESSIBILITY OF PUBLIC
ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT;
(4) LABELING REQUIREMENTS FOR PUBLIC ELECTRIC VEHICLE
SUPPLY EQUIPMENT, INCLUDING CHARGING RATES, CAPACITY, VOLTAGE, AND
CUSTOMER SERVICE CONTACT INFORMATION;
(5) EMPLOYEE TRAINING OR CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS FOR
INDIVIDUALS WHO INSTALL OR PERFORM MAINTENANCE ON PUBLIC ELECTRIC
VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT; AND
(6) MINIMUM HOURS OF OPERATION FOR PUBLIC ELECTRIC VEHICLE
SUPPLY EQUIPMENT AND CUSTOMER SERVICE.
(C) THE SECRETARY:
(1) SHALL PROHIBIT THE OWNER OF PUBLIC ELECTRIC VEHICLE
SUPPLY EQUIPMENT FROM REQUIRING A SUBSCRIPTION OR MEMBERSHIP IN ORDER
FOR A CONSUMER TO USE THE ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT; AND
(2) MAY AUTHORIZE THE OWNER OF PUBLIC ELECTRIC VEHICLE
SUPPLY EQUIPMENT TO OFFER SERVICES ON A SUBSCRIPTION OR MEMBERSHIP
BASIS.
11–506.
THE SECRETARY SHALL DEVELOP PROCEDURES FOR INSPECTING PUBLIC
ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT WHEN A COMPLAINT IS RECEIVED.

SENATE BILL 913 9
11–507.
THE SECRETARY SHALL ESTABLISH A PROCESS FOR THE DECOMMISSIONING
OF PUBLIC ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT.
11–508.
(A) (1) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT
THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE REGULATIONS SHALL, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, BE
CONSISTENT WITH:
(I) THE NATIONAL ELECTRIC VEHICLE INFRASTRUCTURE
FORMULA PROGRAM; AND
(II) THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS TITLE.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
REGULATIONS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL
INCLUDE, AT A MINIMUM:
(I) REPORTING AND RELIABILITY STANDARDS FOR PUBLIC
ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT THAT ARE CONSISTENT WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF § 11–504 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) CONSUMER STANDARDS FOR PUBLIC ELECTRIC VEHICLE
SUPPLY EQUIPMENT THAT ARE CONSISTENT WITH § 11–505 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE RELIABILITY STANDARDS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) ESTABLISH THE METHOD FOR CALCULATING UPTIME; AND
(II) REQUIRE AT LEAST 97% UPTIME FOR PUBLIC ELECTRIC
VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT.
11–509.
ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2026, THE SECRETARY
SHALL COMPILE THE INFORMATION REPORTED UNDER § 11–504 OF THIS SUBTITLE

SENATE BILL 913
DURING THE PREVIOUS CALENDAR YEAR INTO A SINGLE REPORT AND PROVIDE THE
REPORT TO:
(1) THE COMPTROLLER;
(2) THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION; AND
(3) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before December 1, 2025, the Department of Agriculture, in consultation
with the Public Service Commission, shall adopt the regulations required to implement this
Act.
(b) The Department of Agriculture may not require the registration of public
electric vehicle supply equipment, as defined in § 11–501 of the Agriculture Article as
enacted under Section 1 of this Act, or enforce the provisions of this Act until:
(1) for electric vehicle supply equipment placed in service before October 1,
2025, October 1, 2026; and
(2) for electric vehicle supply equipment placed in service on or after
October 1, 2025, January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.